src/kal-lex.txt
+NIAR=TIP=NIR+vv:%>iniartinner	flex-iv ;
+NIAR=TIP=HTR+vv:%>iniartitsi	IV_voq ;
+NIAR=VALLAAR+vv:%>iniarpallaar	flex-iv ;
+NIAR=VALLAAR=NIAR+vv:%>iniarpallaarniar	flex-iv ;
+NIAR=VALLAAR=SIMA+vv:%>iniarpallaarsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+NIAR=VIP+vv:%>iniavip	XIiX ;
+NIAR=VIP=TAR+vv:%>iniavittar	flex-iv ;
+NIAR+TempPart:%>iniutaa	part ;
+NIAALUP+vv:%>iniaalup	flex-iv ;
+NIAALUP=GALUAR+vv:%>iniaalukkaluar	flex-iv ;
+NIAALUP=TAR+vv:%>iniaaluttar	flex-iv ;
+NIAALUP=TAR=LIR+vv:%>iniaaluttaler	flex-iv ;
+NIINNAR+vv:%>iniinnar	flex-iv ;
+NIINNAR=GALUAR+vv:%>iniinnaraluar	flex-iv ;
+NIINNAR=LIR+vv:%>iniinnaler	XIiX ;
+NIINNAR=LIR=GALUAR+vv:%>iniinnaleraluar	flex-iv ;
+NIKUU+vv:%>inikuu	flex-iv_voq ;
+NIKUU=NNGIT+vv:%>inikuunngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NIKUU=NNGIT=GALLAR+vv:%>inikuunngikkallar	flex-iv ;
+NIKUU=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>inikuunngikkaluar	flex-iv ;
+NIKUU=NNGIT=NGAJAP+vv:%>inikuunngingajap	flex-iv ;
+NIKUU=NNGIT=NIR+vv:%>inikuunnginner	flex-iv ;
+NIKUU=NNGIT=NNGUATSIAR+vv:%>inikuunnginnguatsiar	flex-iv ;
+NIR+vv:%>iner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+NIRAR+vv:%>inerar	flex-iv ;
+NIRAR+vv:%>inerar	flex-tv ;
+NIRAR=GALUAR+vv:%>ineraraluar	flex-iv ;
+NIRAR=GALUAR+vv:%>ineraraluar	flex-tv ;
+NIRAR=TAR+vv:%>inerartar	flex-iv ;
+NIRAR=TAR+vv:%>inerartar	flex-tv ;
+NIRAR=TAR=RIAR+vv:%>inerartariar	flex-iv ;
+NIRAR=TAR=RIAR+vv:%>inerartariar	flex-tv ;
+NIRAR=TIP+vv:%>inerartip	flex-iv ;
+NIRAR=TIP=TAR+vv:%>inerartittar	flex-iv ;
+NIRLUP+vv:%>inerlup	flex-iv ;
+NIRLUP=HTR=QQIP=TAR=SIMA+vv:%>inerlueqqittarsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+NIRLUP=NIAR=NNGIT=QE+vv:%>inerlunniannge%TRUNCq	flex-iv_schwa ;
+NIRLUP=NIR+vv:%>inerlunner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+NIRLUP=RIATAAR+vv:%>inerloriataar	flex-iv ;
+NIRLUP=RIATAAR=SINNAA+vv:%>inerloriataarsinnaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+NIRLUP=TIP=GUMA=NNGIT+vv:%>inerlutsikkumanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NIRLUP=TIP=GUMA=NNGIT+vv:%>inerlutsikkumanngi	nngisaq ;
+NIRLUP=TIP=SIMA+vv:%>inerlutsissima	flex-iv_voq ;
+NIRU+vv:%>ineru	flex-iv_voq ;
+NIRU=GAJUP+vv:%>inerukkajup	flex-iv ;
+NIRU=GAJUP=TAR:%>inerukkajuttar	flex-iv ;
+NIRU=LAAR+vv:%>inerulaar	flex-iv ; 
+NIRU=LAAR=RIAR+vv:%>inerulaariar	flex-iv ;
+NIRU=LAAR=SIMA=NIR+vv:%>inerulaarsimaner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+NIRU=LAAR=TAR+vv:%>inerulaartar	flex-iv ;
+NIRU=LAAR=TARE+vv:%>inerulaartar	flex-iv_schwa ;
+NIRU=LIR+vv:%>ineruler	XIiX ;
+NIRU=LIR=GALUAR+vv:%>ineruleraluar	flex-iv ;
+NIRU=LIR=NNGIT+vv:%>inerulinngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NIRU=LIR=SIMA+vv:%>inerulersima	flex-iv_voq ;
+NIRU=LIR=SIMA=GALUAR+vv:%>inerulersimagaluar	flex-iv ;
+NIRU=NGAAR+vv:%>inerungaar	flex-iv ;
+NIRU=NGAAR=SIMA+vv:%>inerungaarsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+NIRU=NGAAR=SIMA=NNGIT+vv:%>inerungaarsimanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NIRU=NNGIT+vv:%>inerunngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NIRU=NNGIT=NIR+vv:%>inerunnginner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+NIRU=QQAJAR=QE+vv:%>ineroqqaja%TRUNCq	flex-iv_schwa ;
+NIRU=SIMA+vv:%>inerusima	flex-iv_voq ;
+NIRU=SIMA=SSA=GALUAR=NIR+vv:%>inerusimassagaluarner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+NIRU=SIMA=SSA=GALUAR+vv:%>inerusimassagaluar	flex-iv ;
+NIRU=SSA+vv:%>inerussa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+NIRU=TAR+vv:%>inerusar	flex-iv ;
+NIRU=TIP+vv:%>inerutip	flex-iv ;
+NIRU=TIP+vv:%>inerutip	Taq ;
+NIRU=TIP=NNGIT+vv:%>inerutinngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NIRU=TIP=NNGIT+vv:%>inerutinngi	nngisaq ;
+NIUP+vv:%>iniup	flex-iv ;
+NNGISAANNAR+vv:%>inngisaannar	flex-iv ; 
+NNGISAANNAR=NGAJAP+vv:%>inngisaannangajap	flex-iv ;
+NNGISAANNAR=SIMA+vv:%>inngisaannarsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGISAANNAR=SSA+vv:%>inngisaannassa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+NNGIT+vv:%>inngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NNGIT=GAJUP+vv:%>inngikkajup	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=GALLAR+vv:%>inngikkallar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=GALLAR=SSA+vv:%>inngikkallassa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+NNGIT=GALLAR=TIP+vv:%>inngikkallartip	Taq ;
+NNGIT=GALLAR=TIP+vv:%>inngikkallartip	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>inngikkaluar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=GALUAR=LLAR+vv:%>inngikkaluallar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=GALUAR=NGAAR+vv:%>inngikkaluangaar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=GALUAR=NIKUU+vv:%>inngikkaluarnikuu	flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGIT=GALUAR=NIRAR+vv:%>inngikkaluarnerar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=GALUAR=PALUP+vv:%>inngikkaluarpalup	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=GALUAR=QE+vv:%>inngikkalua%TRUNCq	flex-iv_schwa ;
+NNGIT=GALUAR=RUTTUR+vv:%>inngikkaluaruttor	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=GALUAR=SIMA+vv:%>inngikkaluarsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGIT=GALUAR=SINNAA+vv:%>inngikkaluarsinnaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGIT=INNAR+vv:%>inngiinnar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=INNAR=RIAR+vv:%>inngiinnariar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=GALUAR=SINNAR+vv:%>inngikkaluarsinnar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=GALUAR=NIR+vv:%>inngikkaluarner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+NNGIT=LIR+vv:%>inngiler	XIiX ;
+NNGIT=LIR=TUR+vv:%>inngilertor	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=LIR=TUR=RIAR+vv:%>inngilertoriar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=LLUAR+vv:%>inngilluar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=LLUINNAR+vv:%>inngilluinnar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=LLUINNAR=SIMA+vv:%>inngilluinnarsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGIT=LLUINNAR=SSA+vv:%>inngilluinnassa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+NNGIT=NIAR+vv:%>innginniar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=NIAR=GALUAR+vv:%>innginniaraluar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=NIAR=GALUAR=RIAR+vv:%>innginniaraluariar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=NIAR=GALUAR=RIAR=SINNAR+vv:%>innginniaraluariarsinnar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=NIAR=GUMAAR+vv:%>innginniarumaar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=NIAR=SSA+vv:%>innginniassa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+NNGIT=NIAR=SINNAA+vv:%>innginniarsinnaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGIT=NIAR=SINNAA=NIR+vv:%>innginniarsinnaaner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+NNGIT=NIAR=SINNAA=NNGIT+vv:%>innginniarsinnaanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NNGIT=NIAR=TAR+vv:%>innginniartar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=NIAR=TAR=TIGE+vv:%>innginniartartig	IVschwa ;
+NNGIT=NIR+vv:%>innginner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+NNGIT=NIRAR+vv:%>innginnerar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=NIRU+vv:%>innginneru	flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGIT=NIRU=LIR+vv:%>innginneruler	XIiX ;
+NNGIT=NIRU=LIR=SIMA+vv:%>innginnerulersima	flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGIT=NIRU=NGAAR+vv:%>innginnerungaar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=NNGUATSIAR+vv:%>innginnguatsiar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=NNGUATSIAR=VIP+vv:%>innginnguatsiavip	XIiX ;
+NNGIT=PASIP+vv:%>inngippasip	XIiX ;
+NNGIT=QQAJAA+vv:%>inngeqqajaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGIT=QE+vv:%>innge%TRUNCq	flex-iv_schwa ;
+NNGIT=QQIP=NAVIAR=NNGIT+vv:%>inngeqqinnavianngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NNGIT=RIAR+vv:%>inngeriar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=RIIR+vv:%>inngereer	XIiX ;
+NNGIT=RUTTUR+vv:%>inngeruttor	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=SIMA+vv:%>inngissima	flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGIT=SIMA=NNGIT+vv:%>inngissimanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NNGIT=TAR+vv:%>inngittar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=TAR=TIGE+vv:%>inngittartig	IVschwa ;
+NNGIT=TIGE+vv:%>inngitsig	flex-iv_schwa ;
+NNGIT=TIGE=SSA=GALUAR+vv:%>inngitsigissagaluar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=TSIAR=RIAR+vv:%>inngitsiariar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=TUUR+vv:%>inngitsoor	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=NAVIAR=NNGIT+vv:%>inngitsoornavianngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=SSAAR+vv:%>inngitsuusaar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=SIMA+vv:%>inngitsoorsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=SIMA=RIAR+vv:%>inngitsoorsimariar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=SINNAA+vv:%>inngitsoorsinnaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=SINNAA=NNGIT+vv:%>inngitsoorsinnaanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=TAR+vv:%>inngitsoortar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=TAR=GALUAR+vv:%>inngitsoortaraluar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=TAR=LIR+vv:%>inngitsoortaler	XIiX ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=TAR=NIR+vv:%>inngitsoortarner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=TAR=SIMA=NIR+vv:%>inngitsoortarsimaner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=TIP+vv:%>inngitsoortip	Taq ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=TIP=NIQAR=NNGIT+vv:%>inngitsoortinneqanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NNGIT=TUUR=TIP=NIAR+vv:%>inngitsoortinniar	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=VALLAAR+vv:%>inngippallaar     flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=VALLAAR=LIR+vv:%>inngippallaaler       XIiX ;
+NNGIT=VALLAAR=LIR=SIMA+vv:%>inngippallaalersima      flex-iv_voq ;
+NNGIT=VALLAAR=NNGIT+vv:%>inngippallaanngi    flex-iv_nngit ;
+NNGIT=VALLAAR=QE+vv:%>inngippallaa%TRUNCq  flex-iv_schwa ;
+NNGIT=VALLAAR=SSA+vv:%>inngippallaassa       flex-iv_ssa ;
+NNGIT=VALLAAR=SSA=NNGIT+vv:%>inngippallaassanngi     flex-iv_nngit ;
+NNGIT=VIP+vv:%>inngivip	flex-iv ;
+NNGIT=VIP=GALUAR+vv:%>inngivikkaluar	flex-iv ;
+NNGUALLAARE+vv:%>innguallaar	flex-iv_schwa ;
+NNGUAR+vv:%>innguar	flex-iv ;
+NNGUAR=GALUAR+vv:%>innguaraluar	flex-iv ; 
+NNGUAR=GALUAR=NNGIT+vv:%>innguaraluanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+NNGUATSIAR+vv:%>innguatsiar	flex-iv ;
+NNGUATSIAR=GALUAR+vv:%>innguatsiaraluar	flex-iv ;
+NNGUATSIAR=QE+vv:%>innguatsia%TRUNCq	flex-iv_schwa ;
+NNGUATSIAR=VIP+vv:%>innguatsiavip	XIiX ;
+PAJAAR+vv:%>ipajaar	flex-iv ;
+PAJAAR=GALLAR+vv:%>ipajaarallar	gallar-iv ;
+PAJAAR=GALUAR+vv:%>ipajaaraluar	flex-iv ;
+PAJAAR=GUNAR+vv:%>ipajaarunar	flex-iv ;
+PAJAAR=INNAR+vv:%>ipajaaginnar	flex-iv ;
+PAJAAR=KANNIR+vv:%>ipajaakanner	flex-iv ;
+PAJAAR=LAAR+vv:%>ipajaalaar	flex-iv ;
+PAJAAR=LIR+vv:%>ipajaaler	XIiX ;
+PAJAAR=NIKUU+vv:%>ipajaarnikuu	flex-iv_voq ;
+PAJAAR=NIRAR+vv:%>ipajaarnerar	flex-iv ;
+PAJAAR=PALUP+vv:%>ipajaarpalup	flex-iv ;
+PAJAAR=PASIP+vv:%>ipajaarpasip	XIiX ;
+PAJAAR=QQA+vv:%>ipajaaqqa	flex-iv_voq ;
+PAJAAR=QQU+vv:%>ipajaaqqu	flex-iv_voq ;
+PAJAAR=RIAR+vv:%>ipajaariar	flex-iv ;
+PAJAAR=RIIR+vv:%>ipajaareer	flex-iv ;
+PAJAAR=SIMA+vv:%>ipajaarsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+PAJAAR=SINNAA+vv:%>ipajaarsinnaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+PAJAAR=TAR+vv:%>ipajaartar	flex-iv ;
+PAJAAR=TAR=GALUAR+vv:%>ipajaartaraluar	flex-iv ;
+PAJAAR=TARIAQAR+vv:%>ipajaartariaqar	flex-iv ;
+PALAAR+vv:%>ipalaar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP+vv:%>erpallap	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP+vv:%>ipallap	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=GALUAR=SINNAR+vv:%>erpallakkaluarsinnar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=GALUAR=SINNAR+vv:%>ipallakkaluarsinnar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=GUMAAR+vv:%>ipallakkumaar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=GALUAR+vv:%>erpallakkaluar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=GALUAR+vv:%>pallakkaluar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=LAAR+vv:%>erpallalaar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=NIAR+vv:%>erpallanniar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=NIAR+vv:%>ipallanniar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=NNGIT+vv:%>erpallanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+PALLAP=NNGUAR=TSIAR+vv:%>erpallannguatsiar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=NNGUAR=TSIAR+vv:%>ipallannguatsiar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=NNGUAR+vv:%>erpallannguar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=NNGUAR+vv:%>ipallannguar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=RIAR+vv:%>erpallariar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=RIAR+vv:%>ipallariar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=SSA=GALUAR+vv:%>erpallassagaluar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=SSA=GALUAR+vv:%>ipallassagaluar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=TAR+vv:%>ipallattar	flex-iv ;
+PALLAP=TARE+vv:%>ipallattar	flex-iv_schwa ;
+PALLAP=SSA+vv:%>erpallassa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+PALLAP=SSA+vv:%>ipallassa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+PALUP+vv:%>erpalup	flex-iv ;
+PALUP=LIR+vv:%>erpaluler	XIiX ;
+PALUP=LIR=GALUAR+vv:%>erpaluleraluar	flex-iv ;
+PALUP=LIR=LLAR+vv:%>erpalulillar	flex-iv ;
+PALUP=LLUINNAR+vv:%>erpalulluinnar	flex-iv ;
+PALUP=NIAR=VIP+vv:%>erpalunniavip	XIiX ;
+PALUP=NIR+vv:%>erpalunner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+PALUP=NIRU+vv:%>erpalunneru	flex-iv_voq ;
+PALUP=NNGIT+vv:%>erpalunngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+PALUP=NNGIT=VIP+vv:%>erpalunngivip	XIiX ;
+PALUP=QE+vv:%>erpalo%TRUNCq	flex-iv_schwa ;
+PALUP=RIAR+vv:%>erpaloriar	flex-iv ;
+PALUP=RIAR=GALUAR+vv:%>erpaloriaraluar	flex-iv ;
+PALUP=TAR+vv:%>erpaluttar	flex-iv ;
+PALUP=TIGE+vv:%>erpalutsig	flex-iv_schwa ;
+PALUP=TUAR+vv:%>erpaluttuar	flex-iv ;
+PASIP+vv:%>erpasip	XIiX ;
+PASIP=GUNNAIR+vv:%>erpasikkunnaar	XIiX ;
+PASIP=GUNNAIR=RIAR+vv:%>erpasikkunnaariar	flex-iv ;
+PASIP=LLUINNAR+vv:%>erpasilluinnar	flex-iv ;
+PASIP=LLUINNAR=GALUAR+vv:%>erpasilluinnaraluar	flex-iv ;
+PASIP=NNGIT+vv:%>erpasinngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+PASIP=NNGIT=LLUINNAR+vv:%>erpasinngilluinnar	flex-iv ;
+PASIP=NNGIT=VIP+vv:%>erpasinngivip	XIiX ;
+PASIP=QE+vv:%>erpase%TRUNCq	flex-iv_schwa ;
+PASIP=RIAR+vv:%>erpaseriar	flex-iv ;
+PASIP=TUAR=INNAR+vv:%>erpasittuaannar	flex-iv ;
+PIAR+vv:%>erpiar	flex-iv ;
+PIAR=GALLAR+vv:%>erpiarallar	gallar-iv ;
+PIAR=GUNAR+vv:%>erpiarunar	flex-iv ;
+PIAR=GUNAR=NNGIT+vv:%>erpiarunanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+PIAR=GUNAR=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>erpiarunanngikkaluar	flex-iv ;
+PIAR=NIKUU+vv:%>erpiarnikuu	flex-iv_voq ;
+PIAR=NIKUU=NNGIT+vv:%>erpiarnikuunngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+PIAR=NNGIT+vv:%>erpianngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+PIAR=NNGIT=GALLAR+vv:%>erpianngikkallar	gallar-iv ;
+PIAR=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>erpianngikkaluar	flex-iv ;
+PIAR=NNGIT=GUNAR+vv:%>erpianngikkunar	flex-iv ;
+PIAR=NNGIT=INNAR+vv:%>erpianngiinnar	flex-iv ;
+PIAR=NNGIT=KULAAR+vv:%>erpianngikulaar	flex-iv ;
+PIAR=NNGIT=NGAJAP+vv:%>erpianngingajap	flex-iv ;
+PIAR=NNGIT=NIKUU+vv:%>erpiannginnikuu	flex-iv_voq ;
+PIAR=NNGIT=NIRAR+vv:%>erpiannginnerar	flex-iv ;
+PIAR=NNGIT=NNGUATSIAR+vv:%>erpiannginnguatsiar	flex-iv ;
+PIAR=NNGIT=PAJAAR+vv:%>erpianngipajaar	flex-iv ;
